tests/звено.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах звено":
    звено<n><nom> :  звено 
    звено<n><gen> :  звенон 
    звено<n><dat> :  звенона 
    звено<n><loc> :  звенора 
    звено<n><abl> :  звеноран 
    звено<n><ins> :  звенопа 
    звено<n><abe> :  звеносӑр 
    звено<n><ben> :  звеношӑн
    звено<n><px1sg><nom> :  звеном 
    звено<n><px1sg><gen> :  звеномӑн 
    звено<n><px1sg><dat> :  звенома 
    звено<n><px1sg><loc> :  звеномра 
    звено<n><px1sg><abl> :  звеномран 
    звено<n><px1sg><ins> :  звеномпа 
    звено<n><px1sg><abe> :  звеномсӑр 
    звено<n><px1sg><ben> :  звеномшӑн
    звено<n><px2sg><nom> :  звену 
    звено<n><px2sg><gen> :  звенун 
    звено<n><px2sg><dat> :  звенуна 
    звено<n><px2sg><loc> :  звенунта 
    звено<n><px2sg><abl> :  звенунтан 
    звено<n><px2sg><ins> :  звенупа 
    звено<n><px2sg><abe> :  звенусӑр 
    звено<n><px2sg><ben> :  звенушӑн
    звено<n><px3sp><nom> :  звени 
    звено<n><px3sp><gen> :  звенин 
    звено<n><px3sp><dat> :  звенине 
    звено<n><px3sp><loc> :  звенинче 
    звено<n><px3sp><abl> :  звенинчен 
    звено<n><px3sp><ins> :  звенипе 
    звено<n><px3sp><abe> :  звенисӗр 
    звено<n><px3sp><ben> :  звенишӗн
    звено<n><px1pl><nom> :  звеномӑр 
    звено<n><px1pl><gen> :  звеномӑрӑн 
    звено<n><px1pl><dat> :  звеномӑра 
    звено<n><px1pl><loc> :  звеномӑрта 
    звено<n><px1pl><abl> :  звеномӑртан 
    звено<n><px1pl><ins> :  звеномӑрпа 
    звено<n><px1pl><abe> :  звеномӑрсӑр 
    звено<n><px1pl><ben> :  звеномӑршӑн
    звено<n><px2pl><nom> :  звенӑр 
    звено<n><px2pl><gen> :  звенӑрӑн 
    звено<n><px2pl><dat> :  звенӑра 
    звено<n><px2pl><loc> :  звенӑрта 
    звено<n><px2pl><abl> :  звенӑртан 
    звено<n><px2pl><ins> :  звенӑрпа 
    звено<n><px2pl><abe> :  звенӑрсӑр 
    звено<n><px2pl><ben> :  звенӑршӑн
    звено<n><pl><nom> :  звеносем 
    звено<n><pl><gen> :  звеносен 
    звено<n><pl><dat> :  звеносене 
    звено<n><pl><loc> :  звеносенче 
    звено<n><pl><abl> :  звеносенчен 
    звено<n><pl><ins> :  звеносемпе 
    звено<n><pl><abe> :  звеносемсӗр 
    звено<n><pl><ben> :  звеносемшӗн
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  звеномсем 
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  звеномсен 
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  звеномсене 
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  звеномсенче 
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  звеномсенчен 
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  звеномсемпе 
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  звеномсемсӗр 
    звено<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  звеномсемшӗн
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  звенусем 
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  звенусен 
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  звенусене 
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  звенусенче 
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  звенусенчен 
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  звенусемпе 
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  звенусемсӗр 
    звено<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  звенусемшӗн
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  звенисем 
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  звенисен 
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  звенисене 
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  звенисенче 
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  звенисенчен 
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  звенисемпе 
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  звенисемсӗр 
    звено<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  звенисемшӗн
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  звеномӑрсем 
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  звеномӑрсен 
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  звеномӑрсене 
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  звеномӑрсенче 
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  звеномӑрсенчен 
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  звеномӑрсемпе 
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  звеномӑрсемсӗр 
    звено<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  звеномӑрсемшӗн
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  звенӑрсем 
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  звенӑрсен 
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  звенӑрсене 
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  звенӑрсенче 
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  звенӑрсенчен 
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  звенӑрсемпе 
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  звенӑрсемсӗр 
    звено<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  звенӑрсемшӗн
